trunk/incubator/apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaBbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiLlMmNnÑñOoPpRrSsTtUuVvXxYyZzÁáÉéÍíÓóÚúÜüḤḥḶḷQqWwKk</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="infps"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="gerps"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>¿</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="man/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="af/án__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>án</l>
          <r>án<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anes</l>
          <r>án<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="us/u__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="axente__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alfo/z__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aguafiestes__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anglosax/ón__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ón</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ones</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="activid/á__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="acróbat/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="astrólog/u__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="es/ame__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámenes</l>
          <r>ame<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>ame<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abogacía__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="matriarc/áu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áu</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aos</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adivinan/za__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aclar/áu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áu</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aos</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aici/ón__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ones</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ón</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="matriarcáu"><i>matriarc</i><par n="matriarc/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mano"><i>man</i><par n="man/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alfoz"><i>alfo</i><par n="alfo/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ablanucal"><i>ablanucal</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abogacía"><i>abogacía</i><par n="abogacía__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acabamientu"><i>acabamient</i><par n="us/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acebuche"><i>acebuche</i><par n="pie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acentuación"><i>acentuaci</i><par n="aici/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acupuntura"><i>acupuntura</i><par n="abogacía__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adicción"><i>adicci</i><par n="aici/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afán"><i>af</i><par n="af/án__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afeutividá"><i>afeutivid</i><par n="activid/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aguafiestes"><i>aguafiestes</i><par n="aguafiestes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aguiyonamientu"><i>aguiyonamient</i><par n="us/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alacrán"><i>alacr</i><par n="af/án__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alambique"><i>alambique</i><par n="pie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albañil"><i>albañil</i><par n="mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alcaraván"><i>alcarav</i><par n="af/án__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aldovinanza"><i>aldovinan</i><par n="adivinan/za__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aleluya"><i>aleluy</i><par n="acróbat/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alguacil"><i>alguacil</i><par n="mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="allambre"><i>allambre</i><par n="pie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="almirante"><i>almirante</i><par n="axente__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alquitrán"><i>alquitr</i><par n="af/án__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altavoz"><i>altavo</i><par n="alfo/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alusión"><i>alusi</i><par n="aici/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alxebrista"><i>alxebrist</i><par n="acróbat/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alza"><i>al</i><par n="adivinan/za__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amasáu"><i>amas</i><par n="aclar/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ambigüedá"><i>ambigüed</i><par n="activid/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andanza"><i>andan</i><par n="adivinan/za__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anglosaxón"><i>anglosax</i><par n="anglosax/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anovamientu"><i>anovamient</i><par n="us/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antílope"><i>antílope</i><par n="pie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antropólogu"><i>antropólog</i><par n="astrólog/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aptitú"><i>aptitú</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árabe"><i>árabe</i><par n="axente__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aráu"><i>ar</i><par n="aclar/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbitrariedá"><i>arbitraried</i><par n="activid/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arcabuz"><i>arcabu</i><par n="alfo/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="archivística"><i>archivística</i><par n="abogacía__n"/></e>
    <e lm="armariu"><i>armari</i><par n="us/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arqueólogu"><i>arqueólog</i><par n="astrólog/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artesanáu"><i>artesan</i><par n="aclar/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ascendiente"><i>ascendiente</i><par n="axente__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ascensión"><i>ascensi</i><par n="aici/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astrólogu"><i>astrólog</i><par n="astrólog/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astronauta"><i>astronaut</i><par n="acróbat/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asturiense"><i>asturiense</i><par n="axente__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atentáu"><i>atent</i><par n="aclar/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autoridá"><i>autorid</i><par n="activid/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auxiliar"><i>auxiliar</i><par n="mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="axedrez"><i>axedre</i><par n="alfo/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="axoma"><i>axom</i><par n="acróbat/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="axuntanza"><i>axuntan</i><par n="adivinan/za__n"/></e>
    <e lm="azúcare"><i>azúcare</i><par n="pie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="babel"><i>babel</i><par n="mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bacteriólogu"><i>bacteriólog</i><par n="astrólog/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baillón"><i>baill</i><par n="anglosax/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balear"><i>balear</i><par n="mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barragán"><i>barrag</i><par n="af/án__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bautizu"><i>bautiz</i><par n="us/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baxista"><i>baxista</i><par n="axente__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beatitú"><i>beatitú</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berrón"><i>berr</i><par n="anglosax/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bicharchar"><i>bicharchar</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
